Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2788YH (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 618 Section 1. Section 321N.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. âDigital networkâ means an online-enabled application, 3 internet site, or system offered or utilized by a 4 transportation network company that enables transportation 5 network company riders to prearrange rides with transportation 6 network company drivers. A âdigital networkâ is not a product 7 under the Code. 8